02_Morphology/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число

%>                   ! Граница морфемы
%} 

%{A%}

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON CASES

%<ins%>:%>n%{A%} # ;

LEXICON PLURAL

             # ;
%<pl%>:%>сем # ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица"
пакча:пакча N ;   ! "сад"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет"
